Washington statutes.
RCW 4.08.150

Substitution and interpleader.

A defendant against whom an action is pending upon a contract, or for specific real or personal property, at any time before answer, upon affidavit that a person not a party to the action, and without collusion with him or her, makes against him or her a demand for the same debt or property, upon due notice to such person and the adverse party, may apply to the court for an order to substitute such person in his or her place, and discharge him or her from liability to either party on his or her depositing in court the amount of the debt, or delivering the property or its value to such person as the court may direct; and the court may make the order.

[ 2011 c 336 s 75; Code 1881 s 22; 1877 p 6 s 22; 1869 p 7 s 22; 1854 p 132 s 12; RRS s 198.]

NOTES:

Rules of court: Interpleader—CR 22; Substitution—CR 25.